Washington statutes.
RCW 4.18.020

Conflict of laws—Limitation periods.

(1) Except as provided by RCW 4.18.040, if a claim is substantively based:

(a) Upon the law of one other state, the limitation period of that state applies; or

(b) Upon the law of more than one state, the limitation period of one of those states, chosen by the law of conflict of laws of this state, applies.

(2) The limitation period of this state applies to all other claims.

[ 1983 c 152 s 2.]